Illinois, session 104th, SB3665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit to support Illinois energy choice and 8workforce retention.9    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2026 10and ending on or before December 31, 2030, each qualified 11taxpayer may apply to the Department for a credit against the 12tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 13Act in an amount equal to 20% of the wages paid by the 14qualified taxpayer to a qualified energy choice worker based 15in Illinois in the taxable year. In no event shall a taxpayer 16receive a credit of more than $2,000 per employee in any 17taxable year. No taxpayer may claim a credit for more than 50 18employees in any taxable year. 19    (b) In order to be eligible for a tax credit under this 20Section, a taxpayer must (i) be a regulated utility in the 21State of Illinois or a power generating company providing 22baseload or intermediate generation in Illinois, (ii) be 23subject to the provisions of Public Act 102-662, and (iii) be   SB3665- 2 -LRB104 18872 HLH 32317 b1able to demonstrate an adverse and material operational impact 2to either its overall Illinois-based workforce or its ability 3to conduct business in Illinois based on the scheduled 4phaseout target dates of 2030, 2035, 2040, and 2045 contained 5in Public Act 102-662 on the qualified taxpayer's generational 6units in Illinois. 7    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 8the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 9the tax credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the 10excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability 11of the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 12credit must be applied to the earliest year for which there is 13a tax liability. If there are credits from more than one tax 14year that are available to offset a liability, then the 15earlier credit must be applied first. 16    (d) The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under 17this Section shall not exceed $25,000,000 in any State fiscal 18year. 19    (e) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 20Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Illinois Power Agency, 21the Illinois Commerce Commission, the Illinois Environmental 22Protection Agency, and any other State agency deemed 23necessary, may adopt rules in order to implement and 24administer the provisions of this Section. 25    (f) As used in this Section:26    "Qualified energy choice worker" means an employee of a   SB3665- 3 -LRB104 18872 HLH 32317 b1qualified taxpayer who is employed and working in Illinois and 2who is directly employed at the qualified taxpayer's 3generational unit in Illinois. 4    "Qualified taxpayer" means an employer operating in 5Illinois that is (i) either a regulated utility in the State of 6Illinois or a power generating company providing baseload or 7intermediate generation in Illinois, (ii) subject to the 8provisions of Public Act 102-662, and (iii) able to 9demonstrate an adverse and material operational impact to 10either its overall Illinois-based workforce or its ability to 11conduct business in Illinois based on the scheduled phaseout 12target dates of 2030, 2035, 2040, and 2045, as provided in 13Public Act 102-662, on the qualified taxpayer's generational 14units in Illinois. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.